Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 38 Regulation of Out of State Real Estate Sales and Dispositions

34-38-1.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall be construed in this chapter to have the following meanings:

“Broker” means a real estate broker duly licensed in this state;

“Disposition” or “dispose of” means any advertisement, sale, exchange, lease, assignment, award by lottery, or other transaction designed to convey an interest in land, subdivision of land, parcel of real estate, lot, or unit thereof when undertaken for gain or profit;

“Offer” means every advertisement, inducement, solicitation, or attempt to bring about a disposition;

“Persons” means an individual, firm, company, association, corporation, government, or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, unincorporated association, or organization, two (2) or more of any of the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Purchaser” means a person who acquired an interest in any lot, parcel, or unit in a subdivision;

“Salesperson” means any person duly licensed in this state as a real estate salesperson;

“Seller” or “developer” means a person who is engaged in the business of disposition of an interest in any lot, parcel, or unit in a subdivision;

“Subdivision” means any improved or unimproved land or tract of land located outside this state which is divided or proposed to be divided into five (5) or more lots, parcels, units or interests for the purpose of disposition at any time as part of a common promotional plan. Any land which is under common ownership or which is controlled by a single developer or a group of developers acting in concert, is contiguous in area, and is designated or advertised as a common unit or known by a common name, shall be presumed, without regard to the number of lots, parcels, units, or interests covered by each individual offering, to be part of a common promotional plan;

“The department” means the Rhode Island department of business regulation and the director thereof or his or her deputy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-2.
Exemptions.

Unless the method of advertisement, offering or disposition is adopted or taken for the purpose of the evasion of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of the federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act, 15 U.S.C., § 1701 et seq., this chapter shall not apply to the making of any advertisement offer or disposition of any subdivision of lot, parcel, or unit or interest therein:

By a purchaser of any subdivision, lot, parcel, or unit thereof for his or her own account in a single or isolated transaction;

To any person who is engaged in the business of the construction of residential, commercial, or industrial buildings, other than any lot, parcel, unit, or interest in any subdivision as defined by §

34-38-1(8)

for disposition;

Pursuant to the order of any court in this state;

By any government or government agency;

To any offer or disposition of any evidence of indebtedness secured by way of any mortgage or deed of trust of real estate;

To securities or units of interest issued by an investment trust regulated under the laws of this state;

To cemetery lots;

To the leasing of apartments, offices, stores, or the leasing of similar space within any apartment building, commercial building, or industrial building.

The department may from time to time, pursuant to rules and regulations issued by it, exempt from any of the provisions of this chapter any subdivision if it finds that the enforcement of the sections with respect to the subdivision or lots, parcels, units, or interests is not necessary in the public interest and for the protection of purchasers by reason of the small amount involved or the limited character of the offering, or because the property has been registered and approved pursuant to the laws of any other state.

Any subdivision which has been registered under the federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act, 15 U.S.C., § 1701 et seq., shall be exempt from the provisions of §

34-38-3

upon filing with the department a certified copy of an effective statement of record filed with the secretary of housing and urban development together with a filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) in respect of each subdivision covered by the effective statement of record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-3.
Filing requirements.

Any person or broker proposing to advertise, offer, or dispose of any subdivision or lot, parcel, unit, or interest therein in this state shall first submit to the department:

Such particulars and details of the subdivision or lots, parcels, units or other interest in any subdivision to be advertised, offered, or to be disposed of as the department may by regulation require, including, but not limited to, a prospectus, property report, or offering statement embodying all the terms relative to the offering and disposition;

A detailed statement of intended and proposed advertising and sale methods and techniques;

A completed license application in such form as the department may require; and

A filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) in respect of each subdivision to be offered or to be disposed of.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 30, § 12.

34-38-4.
Department investigation.

The department may, prior to issuing any license under this chapter to any person or broker, fully investigate all information placed before it under §

34-38-3

and in addition it may carry out a physical examination, investigation, or inspection of any subdivision which is the subject of the application. In addition, the department shall secure a written appraisal of the value of the properties to be offered both in their existing condition and after promised improvements, if any, from not less than one nor more than five (5) real estate appraisers who are not employees of the seller or any of its competitors, and who shall be selected by the department. All reasonable expenses incurred by the department in carrying out the examination, investigation, or inspection or securing the appraisals shall be paid by the applicant and no license shall be issued until the expenses have been fully paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-5.
Approval or disapproval of filing and issuance of license.

The department shall, upon completion of its investigation and inspection but, in the absence of any agreement to the contrary between the applicant and the department, in any case not later than three (3) months from the receipt of the completed license application, or receipt of the effective statement of record filed with the secretary of housing and urban development and filed with the department pursuant to §

34-38-2(c)

, approve or disapprove the prospectus, property report, or offering statement submitted under §

34-38-2(c)

or §

34-38-3

, as the case may be, and shall, if satisfied that the sale of the properties would not be fraudulent nor result in fraud nor be against the public interest, issue to the applicant a license to advertise, offer, and dispose of in this state the subdivision or parcels, units, or other interests in any subdivision the subject of the application or the effective statement of record; the license shall be valid for one year from the date of issuance and thereafter within thirty (30) days of expiration may be renewed annually upon payment to the department of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) in respect of each subdivision covered by the license, unless there is a material change affecting the subdivision or lot, parcels, units, or other interest in any subdivision or the offer or disposition thereof, in which case all new facts shall be reported to the department immediately. Upon receipt of the report or in the event that any material change is discovered by or comes to the attention of the department through other sources, the department may, after hearing pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, take such action as it considers necessary, including the suspension or revocation of the license if justified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-6.
Requirements for offer or disposition.

No subdivision or lot, parcel, unit, or interest in any subdivision shall be disposed of except through a broker, provided nothing herein shall be deemed to prohibit any broker from employing any salesperson for the specific purpose of offering or disposing of, on behalf of the broker and under contract to him or her any lot, parcel, unit or interest in any subdivision. Prior to any advertising offering or disposition, pursuant to any license granted under this chapter, the name of the broker shall be placed on file with the department.

A clearly identified copy of the prospectus, property report, or offering statement shall be given to each purchaser by the broker or salesperson prior to the execution of any contract for the disposition of any property. The broker or salesperson shall obtain from the purchaser a signed receipt for a copy of the prospectus, property report, or offering statement and, if a contract for disposition shall be entered into, the receipt shall be kept in the broker’s files for a period of seven (7) years and shall be subject to inspection by the department.

Any contract or agreement for the disposition of any subdivision or any lot, parcel, unit, or interest in any subdivision not exempt under the provision of §

34-38-2

, where the prospectus, property report, or offering statement has not been given to the purchaser more than seventy-two (72) hours in advance of his or her signing the contract or agreement, may be revoked by the purchaser within seventy-two (72) hours after he or she signed the same or after receipt by him or her of the prospectus, property report, or offering statement, whichever is the later, and the contract or agreement shall so provide. Any revocation shall be in writing in a form prescribed by the department and shall be communicated to the broker or the seller within the time limited by this section and all money paid by the purchasers under the revoked contract or agreement shall be returned to him or her immediately by the broker, without any deductions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-7.
Advertisement and sale.

The department may from time to time pursuant to rules and regulations issued by it regulate and approve the methods and techniques permissible and allowable by any person or broker advertising, offering, or disposing of any subdivision or lot, parcel, unit, or interest therein in this state in order to insure that all prospective purchasers may be fully and fairly apprised of the offer or disposition in a manner that permits the purchasers a full opportunity for considered deliberation and evaluation of the offer or disposition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-8.
Escrow account.

All money paid or advanced by a purchaser or lessee or prospective purchaser or prospective lessee in respect of any lot, parcel, unit, or interest in any subdivision, the advertisement, offering, or disposition of which is controlled by this chapter, or such portion thereof as the department may determine is sufficient for the protection of the interests of the purchaser or lessee, shall be deposited by the seller or lessor in an escrow account, approved by the department, in a bank doing business in this state. The money shall remain in such escrow account until:

A proper and valid release is obtained therefor from the purchasers;

The owner or subdivider or the purchaser or lessee has defaulted under their contract for sale or lease and the department or the court has made a determination as to the disposition of the money; or

The owner or subdivider or the seller or lessor orders the return of the money to the purchaser or lessee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-9.
Appointment of agent and service of process.

No seller or developer of out of state land included under the definition in §

34-38-1

shall directly or indirectly transact any business in this state until it shall have appointed in writing the director of business regulation of this state to be its true and lawful attorney for the service of process upon it in any action arising out of its activities under this chapter or proceeding against it may be served with the same legal force and validity as if served on it, which authority shall continue in force as long as any liability remains outstanding against it in this state. Whenever lawful process against a seller or developer included under the provisions of this chapter shall be served upon the director of business regulation, he or she shall forward a copy of the process served upon him or her, by mail, postpaid, and directed to the home office of the seller or developer; for each copy of the process the director of business regulation shall collect the sum of five dollars ($5.00), which shall be paid by the plaintiff at the time of the service, which sum is to be recovered by the plaintiff as part of the taxable costs if he or she prevails in the suit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-10.
Violations.

Any broker or real estate salesperson, seller, or developer violating any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both, and shall in addition to any other penalty imposed by law, have his or her real estate broker’s or real estate salesperson’s license suspended or revoked by the department for such time as in the circumstances it considers justified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 56, § 1.

34-38-11.
Applicability.

This chapter shall not apply to time-share interests in real estate or any phase of time-share which shall solely be governed by chapter 41 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 1.